Alaska statutes. Title 29. Municipal Government.
Article 5. Acquisition of Additional Powers.

Cross references. —

For municipal power to own sports facilities, see AS

05.35.040

.

Sec. 29.35.300.
Additional powers.

A first class borough acquires an additional areawide power by transfer of the power by a city or by holding an areawide election on the question.

A second class borough acquires an additional power by transfer of the power by a city or by holding an election on the question. For acquisition of an areawide power, the election shall be held areawide. For acquisition of a nonareawide power, the election shall be held nonareawide.

A third class borough acquires an additional power to exercise in a service area by forming a service area in accordance with AS

29.35.490(b)

or (c).

History.

(§ 10 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 29.35.310.
Transfer by city.

A city in a first or second class borough may transfer to the borough in which it is located any of its powers or functions, subject to the approval of the assembly.

A first or second class borough shall exercise all powers transferred to it by a city.

History.

(§ 10 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 29.35.320.
Initiation of acquisition of power.

An election on the question of adding an areawide power in a first class borough or of adding an areawide or nonareawide power in a second class borough may be initiated in two ways:

a number of voters equal to 15 percent of the number of votes cast at the preceding regular election in the area, either areawide or nonareawide, in which the election is to be held may file a petition with the borough clerk; or

the assembly may propose the acquisition of the power.

An election on the question of adding a power in a third class borough for exercise in a service area may be initiated in two ways:

a number of voters equal to 15 percent of the number of votes cast at the preceding regular election in a proposed service area in which the power is sought to be exercised may file a petition with the assembly; or

the assembly may propose the acquisition of the power.

The borough clerk shall certify whether a petition filed under (a) or (b) of this section contains the required number of signatures.

Within 30 days after a petition is certified as containing the required number of signatures or the assembly proposes the acquisition of a power, at least one public hearing shall be held in the borough on the question. The assembly shall then evaluate the ability of the borough to exercise the power and make its findings public. Within 60 days after its findings have been made public, the assembly shall order an election on the question.

History.

(§ 10 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 29.35.330.
Election.

If more than one power is proposed for acquisition under AS

29.35.320

, each shall appear separately on the ballot.

If a power is proposed for exercise by a third class borough in a service area, only voters residing in the proposed service area may vote.

A vote on the question of adding an areawide power in a first or second class borough shall be tabulated in two separate classifications. One shall consist of all votes cast in all cities located in the borough. The other shall consist of all votes cast in the borough area outside all cities. If the majority of the votes cast in each classification is favorable, the borough shall assume the added power within 30 days after certification of the election results.

If a majority of the votes cast on the question of adding a nonareawide power in a second class borough or a power to be exercised in a service area in a third class borough is favorable, the borough shall assume the added power within 30 days after certification of the election results.

The borough mayor shall certify the election results to the department.

History.

(§ 10 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 29.35.340.
Effect of acquiring an areawide power.

On acquisition of an areawide power the first or second class borough succeeds to all of the rights, powers, and duties of any city or service area with respect to that power. The borough succeeds to claims, franchises, and other contractual obligations, liability for bonded and all other indebtedness, and to all of the right, title, and interest in the real and personal property held by a city or service area for the exercise of the power.

The assembly may levy and collect special charges, taxes, or assessments including interest for the purpose of amortizing bonded indebtedness previously incurred by a city or service area for exercising an areawide power acquired by the borough. When a city or service area had previously incurred bonded indebtedness, all property that was in the city or service area at the time the bonds were issued remains subject to taxation to pay the principal of and interest on the bonds.

On acquisition of an additional areawide power the first or second class borough, in consultation with the city or service area personnel, shall arrange for an orderly and equitable transfer of rights, assets, liabilities, powers, duties, and other matters related to acquisition of the areawide powers.

This section applies to home rule and general law cities.

History.

(§ 10 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 29.35.350.
Definition.

In AS

29.35.200

—

29.35.350

, “power” means the provision of a public facility or service, or the exercise of a regulatory power.

History.

(§ 10 ch 74 SLA 1985)